Utah statutes.
31A-8-401.   Enrollee participation.
Every organization shall provide a reasonable procedure, consistent with
Section 31A-4-116, for allowing enrollees to participate in matters of policy
of the organization and for resolving complaints and adverse benefit
determinations initiated by enrollees or providers.
